Mississippi, session 2026, HB4139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  The right of suffrage is hereby fully and completely restored to Charles Howery of Yazoo County, Mississippi, who was disqualified as an elector as a result of his conviction for the crime of Receiving Stolen Property in Yazoo County, on August 18, 1982, for which he was sentenced to serve one (1) year in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was released from custody on July 8, 1983, to serve twenty-four (24) months probation.  On November 11, 1993, he was sentenced to serve seven (7) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections for the crime of Burglary-Nonresidential. He was released from custody on January 14, 1997.  He was sentenced on January 19, 2001, in Yazoo County for Shoplifting, for which he was sentenced to serve one (1) year in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was released from custody on July 30, 2001.  He was sentenced on January 9, 2002, in Yazoo County for the crime of Burglary-Nonresidential, for which he was sentenced to serve two (2) years and six (6) months in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was released from custody on May 15, 2003, to serve thirty (30) months on probation and discharged on June 25, 2003. He was sentenced on December 10, 2004, in Hinds County for the crime of Burglary-Nonresidential for a period of two (2) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections. He was released from custody on May 30, 2005, to serve two (2) years probation.  He was sentenced on December 15, 2005, in Hinds County on the charge of Burglary-Nonresidential for which he was sentenced to serve one (1) year in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was discharged on October 10, 2006.  He was sentenced on December 11, 2006, for the crime of Burglary-Vehicle to serve five (5) years in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was released to probation on February 12, 2009.  He violated probation, it was revoked and as a result he was sentenced to serve the remainder of the term.  He was discharged December 12, 2009.  He was sentenced on August 12, 2010, in Yazoo County for the crime of Robbery and Burglary-Nonresidential to serve a seven (7) year term in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was released to Earned Release Supervision on December 5, 2012, violated his probation and it was revoked.  He was discharged on July 24, 2013.  He was sentenced for one (1) year for the crime of Burglary-Vehicle on June 10, 2014.  He was discharged on August 15, 2015.  He was sentenced on August 5, 2016, in Yazoo County Circuit Court for the crime of Burglary-Nonresidential, for which he was sentenced to serve eleven (11) months in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections.  He was discharged on September 16, 2016. The Legislature is informed that he has since conducted himself as a law-abiding and honorable citizen in a good and lawful manner. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.